Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20203-106
Division; aircraft; purchase; use; report; contents.

(1) The division may purchase aircraft for the use of state government and may sell any state aircraft that is not needed or suitable for state uses. State aircraft shall be subject at all times to the written orders of the Governor for use and service in any branch of the state government. The division shall establish an hourly rate for use of a state aircraft by a state official or agency. The hourly rate shall not include an amount to recover the cost of acquisition by purchase, but shall include amounts for items such as variable fuel and oil costs, routine maintenance costs, landing fees, and preventive maintenance reserves. Such funds shall only be expended for the purposes provided for by this section.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that the use of state-owned, chartered, or rented aircraft by the division shall be for the sole purpose of state business. The division shall electronically file with the Clerk of the Legislature a quarterly report on the use of all state-owned, chartered, or rented aircraft by the division that includes the following information for each trip: The name of the agency or other entity traveling; the name of each individual passenger; all purposes of the trip; the destination and intermediate stops; the miles flown; and the duration of the trip.

Laws 1945, c. 5, § 5, p. 82;

Laws 2014, LB1016, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 6.